District of Columbia statutes.
47-319.03

Compensation.

Members of the Committee shall receive no compensation.

Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 703, 43 DCR 5
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-319.3.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-319.01.